Utah statutes.
4-25-9.   Animals running at large -- Prohibition -- Limited exception.
No person who owns or is in possession of a stallion, jack, or ridgeling over
18 months old, or a ram over three months old, shall permit it to run at large
within the limits of, or on the summer range of, any town or settlement;
provided, that two-thirds of the voters of any county or isolated part of a
county may elect through an election to make this section ineffective in all
or part of the county during part of the year.
